Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.190

Student advisory committees—Consideration of student access and success in educational programs—Advising and assisting administration of four-year institutions of higher education.

(1) One student advisory committee may be formed at each four-year institution of higher education by that institution's recognized student government organization for the purpose of advising and assisting the administration of that four-year institution of higher education on issues that directly affect students' ability to access and succeed in their educational programs. Issues that the student advisory committee may consider include:

(a) The institution's annual budget;

(b) Tuition and fee levels;

(c) Financial aid policies;

(d) Long-range budget priorities and allocation planning; and

(e) Admission and enrollment policies.

(2) Members of a student advisory committee may be appointed in a manner that is consistent with policies adopted by the recognized student government organizations at each institution. If there is both an undergraduate and graduate recognized student government organization at one institution, members of the student advisory committee may be appointed in a manner consistent with policies adopted by both organizations.

(3) The administration of each four-year institution of higher education must: (a) Make readily available all nonconfidential information, documents, and reports requested by the student advisory committee and that are necessary for the committee to provide informed recommendations; and (b) provide the opportunity to present recommendations to the boards of regents or trustees before final decisions of the administration that relate to the issues described in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) A student advisory committee must: (a) Make reasonable efforts to solicit feedback from students regarding the issues described in subsection (1) of this section and matters that are of general interest and impact students; and (b) take reasonable steps to keep students informed of deliberations and actions of the student advisory committee.

[ 2013 c 218 s 4.]